Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.755

Public corporations—Exemption or immunity from taxation—In lieu excise tax.

(1) A public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730, 35.21.660, or 81.112.320 shall receive the same immunity or exemption from taxation as that of the city, town, or county creating the same: PROVIDED, That, except for (a) any property within a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or listed on or which is within a district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites or (b) any property owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation that is used primarily for low-income housing, or that is used as a convention center, performing arts center, public assembly hall, public meeting place, public esplanade, street, public way, public open space, park, public utility corridor, or view corridor for the general public or (c) any blighted property owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation that was acquired for the purpose of remediation and redevelopment of the property in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the city, town, or county in which the property is located, or (d) any property owned, operated, or controlled by a public corporation created under RCW 81.112.320, any such public corporation, commission, or authority shall pay to the county treasurer an annual excise tax equal to the amounts which would be paid upon real property and personal property devoted to the purposes of such public corporation, commission, or authority were it in private ownership, and such real property and personal property is acquired and/or operated under RCW 35.21.730 through 35.21.755, and the proceeds of such excise tax shall be allocated by the county treasurer to the various taxing authorities in which such property is situated, in the same manner as though the property were in private ownership: PROVIDED FURTHER, That the provisions of chapter 82.29A RCW shall not apply to property within a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or listed on or which is within a district listed on any federal or state register of historical sites and which is controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660, which was in existence prior to January 1, 1987: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That property within a special review district established by ordinance prior to January 1, 1976, or property which is listed on any federal or state register of historical sites and controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660, which was in existence prior to January 1, 1976, shall receive the same immunity or exemption from taxation as if such property had been within a district listed on any such federal or state register of historical sites as of January 1, 1976, and controlled by a public corporation, commission, or authority created pursuant to RCW 35.21.730 or 35.21.660 which was in existence prior to January 1, 1976.

(2) As used in this section:

(a) "Low-income" means a total annual income, adjusted for family size, not exceeding fifty percent of the area median income.

(b) "Area median income" means:

(i) For an area within a standard metropolitan statistical area, the area median income reported by the United States department of housing and urban development for that standard metropolitan statistical area; or

(ii) For an area not within a standard metropolitan statistical area, the county median income reported by the department of commerce.

(c) "Blighted property" means property that is contaminated with hazardous substances as defined under RCW 70A.305.020.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1011; 2007 c 104 s 16; 2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 29; 1999 c 266 s 1; 1995 c 399 s 38; 1993 c 220 s 1; 1990 c 131 s 1; 1987 c 282 s 1; 1985 c 332 s 5; 1984 c 116 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 196 s 9; 1977 ex.s. c 35 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 37 s 7.]

NOTES:

Application—Construction—2007 c 104: See RCW 64.70.015.

Findings—Construction—2000 2nd sp.s. c 4 ss 18-30: See notes following RCW 81.112.300.

Effective date—1979 ex.s. c 196: See note following RCW 82.04.240.

Effective date—1977 ex.s. c 35: "This 1977 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1977." [ 1977 ex.s. c 35 s 2.]